Louisiana, session 2026, HB986.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:315.27 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§315.27. Vehicular homicide; child support payments
In addition to the penalties provided in R.S. 14:32.1, any individual convicted
of the crime of vehicular homicide wherein the victim is a parent with a minor child,
the offender shall also be ordered to pay child support pursuant to the schedule for
support provided in R.S. 9:315.19.